Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-707
Issuance; statement; contents; certification.

It shall be the duty of the proper officers of any school district in which any bonds may be voted under the authority of any law of this state, before the issuance of such bonds, to make a written statement of all proceedings relative to the vote upon the issuance of such bonds and the notice of the election, the manner and time of giving notice, the question submitted, and the result of the canvass of the vote on the proposition pursuant to which it is proposed to issue such bonds, together with a full statement of the taxable valuation, the number of children of school age residing in the district, and the total bonded indebtedness of the school district voting such bonds. Such statement shall be certified to under oath by the proper school board of the district.

Laws 1879, § 8, p. 172;

R.S.1913, § 454;

C.S.1922, § 371;

C.S.1929, § 11-907;

R.S.1943, § 10-707;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 24;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 13.

This section, generally described, requires certification under oath of the procedures and results of a bond election. It does not require certification of the preliminary proceedings that led to the election, including the school board vote that called for it. Pierce v. Drobny, 279 Neb. 251, 777 N.W.2d 322 (2010).